foma/verb/ThamizhiVerbs-C11.lexc
LEXICON ClassMudi11Inf





%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^த்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^த்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^த்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^த்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^த்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^த்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^த்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^த்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^த்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^த்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^த்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^த்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^த்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்போம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3pln%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=(த்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^த்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=(த்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^த்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=(த்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^த்தனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கிறனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கின்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+2sg%=∅:^ #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+2pl%=உங்கள்:^ுங்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பித்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பித்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பித்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பித்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பித்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பித்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பித்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பித்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பித்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பித்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பித்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பித்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பித்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிக்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிக்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பிக்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பிக்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பிக்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பிக்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பிக்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பிக்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிக்கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிக்கின்றன் #;

LEXICON ClassMudi11
அனுமானிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
விலாவிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
வக்கிணிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
தவிர்க்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
தண்டிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
மழைக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
மந்தாரிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
கும்பிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
கலவரிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பிரசாதிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பராக்கிரமிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
போகிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
நரிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
சிதைக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
சுறுசுறுக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
செறிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
ஜமாய்க்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
இரட்டிக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
உய்க்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
சிறக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
வரளப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
செல்லப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
குறையப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
திணர்க்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
சடையப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
புரையப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
உமிழப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
அடைச்சப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
அரட்டப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
குணுகப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
காய்ச்சப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
கூம்பப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
வளா்த்தப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
புழங்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பருக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
முடவப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
மாறப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
சறுகப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
சழுங்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
துாற்றப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
தீரும்பப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
நடாத்தப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
நிழற்றப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
நொறுங்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
ஊறப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
உலுங்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
இணுக்கப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பெளப்படமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
அபகரிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
விரேசிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
திட்டிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
தீர்மானிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
குருப்பிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பிரமிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பசபசமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
லச்சிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
சொலிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
இவரிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
கசக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
துவலமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
மெலிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பகுக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
இளிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
குமுக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
கொன்னமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
புலாவமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பூரமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
சுலவமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
துயங்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
ஞெமுக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
நெருடமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
உசாவமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
இறமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
வித்தரிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
திமைக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
தோஷிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
குழைக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பிரவேசிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
படிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
நீளிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
செதுக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
எச்சரிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
உடக்கரிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
கஞலமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
முடிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பிதிர்க்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
இரிக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
குறுகமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
கொம்பமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
புணா்த்தமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
பொதுக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
சுவற்றமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
துவற்றமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
தொளுக்கமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
நந்தமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
உறண்டமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
குறமுடி            ClassMudi11Inf; 
